Tennessee, session 114, HB1366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-36-503(b), is amended by deleting
"within thirty (30) days after settlement" and substituting "within forty-five (45) days after
settlement".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1366
003281
- 1 -